Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.130

Intergovernmental sales.

The board of county commissioners may dispose of county property to another governmental agency and may acquire property for the county from another governmental agency by means of private negotiation upon such terms as may be agreed upon and for such consideration as may be deemed by the board of county commissioners to be adequate.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.34.130. Prior: 1945 c 254 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4014-12.]